California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(B) That part of a final surcharge liability, including related interest, additions to the surcharge, penalties, or other amounts assessed under this part, determined under Article 3 (commencing with Section 41070), Article 4 (commencing with Section 41080), and Article 5 (commencing with Section 41085) of Chapter 4 against a service user who is a consumer that is not required to register with the department under Article 3 (commencing with Section 41040) of Chapter 2.

(3) A
 qualified final surcharge liability may not be compromised with any of the following:

(A) A surcharge payer who previously received a compromise under paragraph (2) for a liability, or a part thereof, arising from a transaction or transactions that are substantially similar to the transaction or transactions attributable to the liability for which the surcharge payer is making the offer.

(B) A business that was transferred by a surcharge payer who previously received a compromise under paragraph (2) and who has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business, when the liability for which the offer is made is attributable to a transaction or transactions substantially similar to the transaction or transactions for which the surcharge payer’s liability was previously compromised.

(C) A business in
 which a surcharge payer who previously received a compromise under paragraph (2) has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business for which the surcharge payer received the compromise, when the liability of the business making the offer arose from a transaction or transactions substantially similar to the transaction or transactions for which the surcharge payer’s liability was previously compromised.

(d) The department may, in its discretion, enter into a written agreement that permits the surcharge payer to pay the compromise in installments for a period not exceeding one year. The agreement may provide that such installments shall be paid by electronic funds transfers or any other means to facilitate the payment of each installment.

(e) A surcharge payer that has received a compromise under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) may be required to enter into
 any collateral agreement that is deemed necessary for the protection of the interests of the state. A collateral agreement may include a provision that allows the department to reestablish the liability, or any portion thereof, if the surcharge payer has sufficient annual income during the succeeding five-year period. The department shall establish criteria for determining “sufficient annual income” for purposes of this subdivision.

(f) A surcharge payer that has received a compromise under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) shall file and pay by the due date all subsequently required emergency telephone users surcharge returns for a five-year period from the date the liability is compromised, or until the surcharge payer is no longer required to file emergency telephone users surcharge returns, whichever period is earlier.

(g) Offers in compromise shall not be considered where the
 surcharge payer has been convicted of felony tax evasion under this part during the liability period.

(h) For amounts to be compromised under this section, the following conditions shall exist:

(1) The surcharge payer shall establish that:

(A) The amount offered in payment is the most that can be expected to be paid or collected from the surcharge payer’s present assets or income.

(B) The surcharge payer does not have reasonable prospects of acquiring increased income or assets that would enable the surcharge payer to satisfy a greater amount of the liability than the amount offered, within a reasonable period of time.

(2) The department shall have determined that acceptance of the
 compromise is in the best interest of the state.

(i) A determination by the department that it would not be in the best interest of the state to accept an offer in compromise in satisfaction of a final surcharge liability shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(j) (1) Offers for liabilities with a fraud or evasion penalty shall require a minimum offer of the unpaid surcharge and fraud or evasion penalty.

(2) The minimum offer may be waived if it can be shown that the surcharge payer making the offer was not the person responsible for perpetrating the fraud or evasion. This authorization to waive only applies to partnership accounts where the intent to commit fraud or evasion can be clearly attributed to a partner of the surcharge payer.

(k) When an offer in compromise is either accepted or rejected, or the terms and conditions of a compromise agreement are fulfilled, the department shall notify the surcharge payer in writing. In the event an offer is rejected, the amount posted will either be applied to the liability or refunded, at the discretion of the surcharge payer.

(l) When more than one surcharge payer is liable for the debt, such as with spouses or partnerships or other business combinations, including, but not limited to, surcharge payers who are liable through dual determination or successor’s liability, the acceptance of an offer in compromise from one liable surcharge payer shall reduce the amount of the liability of the other surcharge payers by the amount of the accepted offer.

(m) Whenever a compromise of surcharges or penalties or total
 surcharges and penalties in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved, there shall be placed on file for at least one year in the office of the director of the department a public record with respect to that compromise. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the surcharge payer.

(2) The amount of unpaid surcharges and related penalties, additions to surcharges, interest, or other amounts involved.

(3) The amount offered.

(4) A summary of the reason why the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secrets, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or
 organizational structure, that if disclosed, would adversely affect the surcharge payer or violate the confidentiality provisions of Section 41132. A list shall not be prepared and releases shall not be distributed by the department in connection with these statements.

(n) A compromise made under this section may be rescinded, all compromised liabilities may be reestablished, without regard to any statute of limitations that otherwise may be applicable, and no portion of the amount offered in compromise refunded, if either of the following occurs:

(1) The department determines that a person did any of the following acts regarding the making of the offer:

(A) Concealed from the department property belonging to the estate of a surcharge payer or other person liable for the surcharge.

(B) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified a book, document, or record or made a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the surcharge payer or other person liable for the surcharge.

(2) The surcharge payer fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions relative to the offer.

(o) A person who, in connection with an offer or compromise under this section, or offer of that compromise to enter into that agreement, willfully does either of the following shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution:

(1) Conceals from an officer or employee of this state property belonging to the estate of a surcharge payer or other person liable in respect of the surcharge.

(2) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies a book, document, or record, or makes a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the surcharge payer or other person liable in respect of the surcharge.

(p) For purposes of this section, “person” means the surcharge payer, a member of the surcharge payer’s family, a corporation, agent, fiduciary, or representative of, or another individual or entity acting on behalf of, the surcharge payer, or another corporation or entity owned or controlled by the surcharge payer, directly or indirectly, or that owns or controls the surcharge payer, directly or indirectly.

(q) This
 section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 272, Sec. 9) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 64.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 65 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 474.)
-------------------------------------------

41171.5.

(a) The director of the department, or their delegates, may compromise any final surcharge liability.

(b) For purposes of this section, “a final surcharge liability” means any final surcharge liability arising under Part 20 (commencing with Section 41001), or related interest, additions to the surcharge, penalties, or other amounts assessed under this part.

(c) Offers in compromise shall be considered only for liabilities that were generated from a business that has been discontinued or transferred, where the surcharge payer making the offer no longer has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business or has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business as
 the transferred or discontinued business.

(d) Offers in compromise shall not be considered where the surcharge payer has been convicted of felony tax evasion under this part during the liability period.

(e) For amounts to be compromised under this section, the following conditions shall exist:

(1) The surcharge payer shall establish that:

(A) The amount offered in payment is the most that can be expected to be paid or collected from the surcharge payer’s present assets or income.

(B) The surcharge payer does not have reasonable prospects of acquiring increased income or assets that would enable the surcharge payer to satisfy a greater amount of the liability than the amount offered, within
 a reasonable period of time.

(2) The department shall have determined that acceptance of the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

(f) A determination by the department that it would not be in the best interest of the state to accept an offer in compromise in satisfaction of a final surcharge liability shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(g) (1) Offers for liabilities with a fraud or evasion penalty shall require a minimum offer of the unpaid surcharge and fraud or evasion penalty.

(2) The minimum offer may be waived if it can be shown that the surcharge payer making the offer was not the person responsible for perpetrating the fraud or evasion. This authorization to waive only applies to
 partnership accounts where the intent to commit fraud or evasion can be clearly attributed to a partner of the surcharge payer.

(h) When an offer in compromise is either accepted or rejected, or the terms and conditions of a compromise agreement are fulfilled, the department shall notify the surcharge payer in writing. In the event an offer is rejected, the amount posted will either be applied to the liability or refunded, at the discretion of the surcharge payer.

(i) When more than one surcharge payer is liable for the debt, such as with spouses or partnerships or other business combinations, including, but not limited to, surcharge payers who are liable through dual determination or successor’s liability, the acceptance of an offer in compromise from one liable surcharge payer shall reduce the amount of the liability of the other surcharge payers by the amount of the accepted
 offer.

(j) Whenever a compromise of surcharges or penalties or total surcharges and penalties in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved, there shall be placed on file for at least one year in the office of the director of the department a public record with respect to that compromise. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the surcharge payer.

(2) The amount of unpaid surcharges and related penalties, additions to surcharges, interest, or other amounts involved.

(3) The amount offered.

(4) A summary of the reason why the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

The public record shall
 not include any information that relates to any trade secrets, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure, that if disclosed, would adversely affect the surcharge payer or violate the confidentiality provisions of Section 41132. A list shall not be prepared and releases shall not be distributed by the department in connection with these statements.

(k) A compromise made under this section may be rescinded, all compromised liabilities may be reestablished, without regard to any statute of limitations that otherwise may be applicable, and no portion of the amount offered in compromise refunded, if either of the following occurs:

(1) The department determines that a person did any of the following acts regarding the making of the offer:

(A) Concealed from the department
 property belonging to the estate of a surcharge payer or other person liable for the surcharge.

(B) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified a book, document, or record, or made a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the surcharge payer or other person liable for the surcharge.

(2) The surcharge payer fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions relative to the offer.

(l) A person who, in connection with an offer or compromise under this section, or offer of that compromise to enter into that agreement, willfully does either of the following shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of
 investigation and prosecution:

(1) Conceals from an officer or employee of this state property belonging to the estate of a surcharge payer or other person liable in respect of the surcharge.

(2) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies a book, document, or record, or makes a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the surcharge payer or other person liable in respect of the surcharge.

(m) For purposes of this section, “person” means the surcharge payer, a member of the surcharge payer’s family, a corporation, agent, fiduciary, or representative of, or another individual or entity acting on behalf of, the surcharge payer, or another corporation or entity owned or controlled by the surcharge payer, directly or indirectly, or that owns or controls the surcharge payer, directly or
 indirectly.

(n) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 272, Sec. 10) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 65.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

41172.

(a) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall release any levy or notice to withhold issued pursuant to this part on any property in the event that the expense of the sale process exceeds the liability for which the levy is made.

(b) (1) (A) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may order the
 release of any levy or notice to withhold issued pursuant to this part or, within 90 days from the receipt of funds pursuant to a levy or notice to withhold, order the return of any amount up to two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300) of moneys received, upon his or her finding that the levy or notice to withhold threatens the health or welfare of the taxpayer or his or her spouse and dependents or family.

(B) The amount the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may return to each taxpayer subject to a levy or notice to withhold, is limited to two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300), or the adjusted amount as specified in paragraph (2), in any monthly period.

(C) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may order amounts returned in the case of a seizure of property as a result of a jeopardy determination, subject to the amounts set or adjusted pursuant to this section and if the ultimate
 collection of the amount due is no longer in jeopardy.

(2) (A) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall adjust the two-thousand-three-hundred-dollar ($2,300) amount specified in paragraph (1) as follows:

(i) On or before March 1, 2016, and on or before March 1 each year thereafter, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall multiply the amount applicable for the current fiscal year by the inflation factor adjustment calculated based on the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index, as recorded by the California Department of Industrial Relations for the most recent year available, and the formula set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17041. The resulting amount will be the applicable amount for the succeeding fiscal year only when the applicable amount computed is equal to or exceeds a new
 operative threshold, as defined in subparagraph (B).

(ii) When the applicable amount equals or exceeds an operative threshold specified in subparagraph (B), the resulting applicable amount, rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars ($100), shall be operative for purposes of paragraph (1) beginning July 1 of the succeeding fiscal year.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “operative threshold” means an amount that exceeds by at least one hundred dollars ($100) the greater of either the amount specified in paragraph (1) or the amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) as the operative adjustment to the amount specified in paragraph (1).

(c) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall not sell any seized property until it has first notified the taxpayer in writing of the exemptions from
 levy under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), this section shall not apply to the seizure of any property as a result of a jeopardy determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 181, Sec. 6.   (SB 1507)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

41172.5.

(a) If any property has been levied upon, the property or the proceeds from the sale of the property shall be returned to the taxpayer if the department determines any one of the following:

(1) The levy on the property was not in accordance with the law.

(2) The taxpayer has entered into and is in compliance with an installment payment agreement pursuant to Section 41127.5 to satisfy the surcharge liability for which the levy was imposed, unless that or another agreement allows for the levy.

(3) The return of the property
 will facilitate the collection of the surcharge liability or will be in the best interest of the state and the taxpayer.

(b) Property returned under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) is subject to the provisions of Section 41174.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 149.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41173.

Exemptions from levy under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be adjusted for purposes of enforcing the collection of debts under this part to reflect changes in the California Consumer Price Index whenever the change is more than 5 percent higher than any previous adjustment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 167.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

41174.

(a) A taxpayer may file a claim with the department for reimbursement of bank charges and any other reasonable third-party check charge fees incurred by the taxpayer as the direct result of an erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action by the department. Bank and third-party charges include a financial institution’s or third party’s customary charge for complying with the levy or notice to withhold instructions and reasonable charges for overdrafts that are a direct consequence of the erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action. The charges are those paid by the taxpayer and not waived or reimbursed by the financial institution or third
 party. Each claimant applying for reimbursement shall file a claim with the department that shall be in a form as may be prescribed by the department. In order for the department to grant a claim, the department shall determine that both of the following conditions have been satisfied:

(1) The erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action was caused by department error.

(2) Prior to the erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action, the taxpayer responded to all contacts by the department and provided the department with any requested information or documentation sufficient to establish the taxpayer’s position. This provision may be waived by the department for
 reasonable cause.

(b) Claims pursuant to this section shall be filed within 90 days from the date the bank and third-party charges were incurred by the taxpayer. Within 30 days from the date the claim is received, the department shall respond to the claim. If the department denies the claim, the taxpayer shall be notified in writing of the reason or reasons for the denial of the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 150.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

41175.

(a) At least 30 days prior to the filing or recording of liens under Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) or Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 7220) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the department shall mail to the taxpayer a preliminary notice. The notice shall specify the statutory authority of the department for filing or recording the lien, indicate the earliest date on which the lien may be filed or recorded, and state the remedies available to the taxpayer to prevent the filing or recording of the lien. In the event tax liens are filed for the same liability in multiple counties, only one preliminary notice shall be sent.

(b) If the department determines that filing a lien was in error, it shall mail a release to the taxpayer and the
 entity recording the lien as soon as possible, but no later than seven days, after this determination and receipt of lien recording information. The release shall contain a statement that the lien was filed in error. In the event the erroneous lien is obstructing a lawful transaction, the department shall immediately issue a release of lien to the taxpayer and the entity recording the lien.

(c) When the department releases a lien erroneously filed, notice of that fact shall be mailed to the taxpayer and, upon the request of the taxpayer, a copy of the release shall be mailed to the major credit reporting companies in the county where the lien was filed.

(d) (1) The department may release or subordinate a lien if the department determines any of the following:

(A) Release or subordination will
 facilitate the collection of the surcharge liability.

(B) Release or subordination will be in the best interest of the state and the taxpayer.

(C) Release or subordination will be in the best interest of the state and another person that is not the taxpayer but that holds an interest with the taxpayer in the property that is subject to the lien.

(2) The amendments added to this subdivision do not constitute a change in, and are declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 66.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

41176.

(a) If any officer or employee of the department recklessly disregards department-published procedures, a taxpayer aggrieved by that action or omission may bring an action for damages against the state
 in superior court.

(b) In any action brought under subdivision (a), upon finding of liability on the part of the state, the state shall be liable to the plaintiff in an amount equal to the sum of all of the following:

(1) Actual and direct monetary damages sustained by the plaintiff as a result of the actions or omissions.

(2) Reasonable litigation costs, including any of the following:

(A) Reasonable court costs.

(B) Prevailing market rates for the kind or quality of services furnished in connection with any of the following:

(i) The reasonable expenses of expert witnesses in connection with the civil proceeding, except that no expert witness shall be compensated at a rate in excess of the highest rate of compensation for expert witnesses paid by the state.

(ii) The reasonable cost of any study, analysis, engineering report, test, or project that is found by the court to be necessary for the preparation of the party’s case.

(iii) Reasonable fees paid or incurred for the services of attorneys in connection with the civil proceeding, except that those fees shall not be in excess of seventy-five dollars ($75) per hour unless the court determines that an increase in the cost of living or a special factor, including the limited availability of qualified attorneys for the proceeding, justifies a
 higher rate.

(c) In the awarding of damages under subdivision (b), the court shall take into consideration the negligence or omissions, if any, on the part of the plaintiff that contributed to the damages.

(d) Whenever it appears to the court that the taxpayer’s position in the proceeding brought under subdivision (a) is frivolous, the court may impose a penalty against the plaintiff in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). A penalty so imposed shall be paid upon notice and demand from the department and shall be collected as a surcharge imposed under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 152.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 21.1. Local Prepaid Mobile Telephony Services Collection Act [42100. - 42111.]

42100.

(a) This part shall be known and may be cited as the Local Prepaid Mobile Telephony Services Collection Act.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Maintaining effective and efficient communications services, 911 emergency systems, communications-related public policy programs to promote universal service, and various local programs across the state benefit all persons with access to the telecommunications system.

(2) Providers of end-use communications services, including providers of mobile voice telecommunications services, which the Federal Communications Commission terms mobile telephony service, are
 required to collect and remit utility users taxes and local 911 or access charges (local charges) imposed by over 150 cities and counties in California on end-users of such mobile telephony services, as required by existing state or local law.

(3) Local charges on telecommunication services represent an important source of tax revenue for many cities and counties and are used to pay for such essential governmental services as public safety, streets, parks, libraries, senior centers, and many more.

(4) Prepaid mobile telephony services are an important and growing segment of the communications industry. Prepaid mobile telephony services, unlike postpaid mobile telephony services, are frequently sold by a third-party seller that is not the provider of mobile telephony services, and collecting local charges from prepaid consumers of mobile telephony services at the time of the retail
 transaction is necessary and the most efficient and competitively neutral means for the collection of those local charges.

(5) The collection of prepaid mobile telephony services by third-party sellers and the remittance of those local charges to the department involves administrative costs and responsibilities that are unique to prepaid mobile telephony services, and therefore justify unique reimbursement and tax rate simplification measures, which are fair and reasonable.

(c) It is a matter of statewide concern that the local charges for local prepaid mobile telephony services be collected in a uniform manner in order for the collection to be fair and uniform on a statewide basis.

(d) It is the intention of the Legislature that this part shall preempt the provisions pertaining to the tax or charge rate, base, and
 method of collection contained in all local ordinances, rules, or regulations concerning the imposition of a local charge upon the consumption of prepaid mobile telephony services to the extent those provisions are inconsistent with the provisions of this part. It is not the intent of the Legislature to otherwise preempt, limit, or affect the general authority of local jurisdictions to impose a utility user tax, local 911 charge, or any other local charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 179, Sec. 1.   (SB 1441)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 42111.)
-------------------------------------------

42101.

For purposes of this part, all of the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Department” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(b) (1) “Direct seller” means a prepaid MTS provider or services supplier, as defined in subdivision (l), that makes a sale of prepaid mobile telephony services directly to a prepaid consumer for any purpose other than resale in the regular course of business. A direct seller includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(A) A telephone corporation, as defined in Section 234 of the Public Utilities Code.

(B) An
 interconnected Voice over Internet Protocol (VoIP) service, as defined in Section 285 of the Public Utilities Code.

(C) A retailer, as defined in Section 6203, that is a member of the same commonly controlled group, as defined in Section 25105, or that is a member of the same combined reporting group, as defined in Section 25106.5(b)(3) of Title 18 of the California Code of Regulations or any successor regulation, as an entity defined in subparagraphs (A) or (B).

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “sale” means any transfer of title, possession, exchange, or barter, conditional or otherwise.

(c) “In this state” means within the exterior limits of the State of California and includes all territory within those limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America.

(d) “Local charge” means the utility user taxes as described in Section 42102, and charges for access to communication services or to local “911” emergency telephone systems, as described in Section 42102.5.

(e) “Local jurisdiction” or “local agency” means a city, county, or city and county, which includes a charter city, county, or city and county.

(f) “Mobile data service” has the same meaning as defined in Section 224.4 of the Public Utilities Code.

(g) “Mobile telephony service” or “MTS” has the same meaning as defined in Section 224.4 of the Public Utilities Code.

(h) “Ordinance” refers to an ordinance of a local jurisdiction or local agency imposing a local charge, including any local
 enactment relating to the filing of a refund or a claim arising under the ordinance.

(i) “Person” includes any individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, limited liability company, association, social club, fraternal organization, corporation, estate, trust, business trust, receiver, assignee for the benefit of creditors, trustee, trustee in bankruptcy, or syndicate, the United States, this state, any city, county, city and county, municipality, district, or other political subdivision of the state, or any other group or combination acting as a unit.

(j) “Prepaid consumer” means a person who purchases prepaid mobile telephony services in a retail transaction.

(k) “Prepaid mobile telephony services” means the right to use a mobile device for mobile telecommunications services or information services, including the
 download of digital products delivered electronically, content, and ancillary services, or both telecommunications services and information services, that must be purchased in advance of usage in predetermined units or dollars. For these purposes, “telecommunications service” and “information service” have the same meanings as defined in Section 153 of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(l) “Prepaid MTS provider” means a telephone corporation, as defined in Section 234 of the Public Utilities Code, that provides prepaid mobile telephony services.

(m) “Retail transaction” means the purchase of prepaid mobile telephony services, either alone or in combination with mobile data or other services, from a seller for any purpose other than resale in the regular course of business. For these purposes, a “purchase” means any transfer of title or possession, exchange, or barter,
 conditional or otherwise.

(n) “Seller” means a person that sells prepaid mobile telephony service to a person in a retail transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 179, Sec. 2.   (SB 1441)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 42111.)
-------------------------------------------

42101.5.

(a) (1) On and after January 1, 2016, a local charge imposed by a local agency on prepaid mobile telephony services shall be collected from the prepaid consumer by a seller at the time of sale, pursuant to this part, if the local agency entered into a contract with the department for the department to perform the functions set forth in Section 42103. In the contract, the local agency shall: (A) certify to the department that its ordinance applies its local charge to prepaid mobile telephony services and that the local agency agrees to indemnify, and hold and save harmless, the department, its officers, agents, and employees for any and all liability for damages that may result from collection pursuant to the contract; and (B) certify to the department the amount of the local 911 charge, as set out in
 Section 42102.5, or the applicable tiered rate for a utility user tax, as set out in Section 42102.

(2) A seller that is not a direct seller shall be permitted to deduct and retain an amount equal to 2 percent of the amounts that are collected by the seller from prepaid consumers for local charges.

(b) In the event that a local agency adopts a new local charge that is imposed on prepaid mobile telephony services after September 1, 2015, the local agency shall enter into a contract with the department to perform the functions set forth in Section 42103, on or before December 1, with collection of the local charge to commence April 1 of the next calendar year. In the contract, the local agency shall certify to the department: (1) that its ordinance applies its local charge to prepaid mobile telephony services and that the local agency agrees to indemnify, and hold and save harmless,
 the department, its officers, agents, and employees for any and all liability for damages that may result from collection pursuant to the contract; and (2) the amount of the local 911 charge, as set out in Section 42102.5, or the applicable tiered rate for a utility user tax, as set out in Section 42102.

(c) In the event that a local agency increases its local charge after September 1, 2015, the local agency shall provide the department with written notice of the increased local charge on or before December 1, with collection of the local charge to commence April 1 of the next calendar year.

(d) In the event that a local agency reduces or eliminates a local charge on prepaid mobile telephony services, the local agency shall provide the department with written notice as required for the department to meet its obligations pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42101.6.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), through and including December 31, 2015, a prepaid MTS provider may elect to remit the local charge to the appropriate local taxing jurisdiction based on the applicable tax rate of Section 42102, Section 42102.5, or both, and those remittances shall be deemed to be in full compliance with the local ordinance imposing a local charge on prepaid mobile telephony service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 179, Sec. 3.   (SB 1441)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 42111.)
-------------------------------------------

42101.6.

(a) (1) The department shall post, for each local jurisdiction, the rate or rates of the local charges, as calculated pursuant to Sections 42102 and 42102.5, that each local jurisdiction has adopted, not later than December 1 of each year, on its internet website. The posted combined rate shall be the rate that applies to all retail transactions during the calendar year beginning April 1 following the posting.

(2) The department shall also separately post on its internet website the individual rates for each of the individual local charges reported pursuant to Section 42101.5.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if a local agency notifies the department
 pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42101.5 that the posted rate is inaccurate or it no longer imposes a local charge or local charges or that the rate of its local charge or local charges has decreased, the department shall promptly post a recalculated rate that is applicable to the jurisdiction of that local agency. The change shall become operative on the first day of the calendar quarter commencing more than 60 days from the date the local agency notifies the department of the inaccuracy or that it no longer imposes a local charge or that the rate of its local charge has decreased. Nothing in this section modifies the notice obligations of Section 799 of the Public Utilities Code. However, beginning January 1, 2016, the notification and implementation requirements of paragraphs (5) and (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 799 of the Public Utilities Code shall not apply to prepaid mobile telephony services.

(4) A seller collecting the local
 charges pursuant to this part may rely upon the accuracy of the information posted on the department’s internet website in collecting and remitting all amounts of local charges.

(b) Except for amounts retained pursuant to subdivision (c), and except as provided in subdivision (d) for a seller that is a direct seller, all amounts of local charges collected by sellers shall be remitted to the department pursuant to Sections 42103, 42103.1, and 42103.2.

(c) A seller that is not a direct seller shall be permitted to deduct and retain an amount equal to 2 percent of the amounts that are collected by the seller from prepaid consumers for local charges.

(d) A direct seller shall remit the local charges to the local jurisdiction or local agency imposing the local charge. Remittance of the local charges shall be separately